California statutes. Business and Professions Code
(a) Any of the boards, bureaus, commissions, or programs within the department may establish, by regulation, a system for an inactive category of licensure for persons who are not actively engaged in the practice of their profession or vocation.

(b) The regulation shall contain the following provisions:

(1) The holder of an inactive license issued pursuant to this section shall not engage in any activity for which a license is required.

(2) An inactive license issued pursuant to this section shall be renewed during the same time period in which an active license is renewed. The holder of an inactive license need not comply with any continuing education requirement for renewal of an active license.

(3) The renewal fee for a license in an active status shall apply also for a renewal of a license in an inactive status, unless a lesser renewal fee is specified by the board.

(4) In order for the holder of an inactive license issued pursuant to this section to restore his or her license to an active status, the holder of an inactive license shall comply with all the following:

(A) Pay the renewal fee.

(B) If the board requires completion of continuing education for renewal of an active license, complete continuing education equivalent to that required for renewal of an active license, unless a different requirement is specified by the board.

(c) This section shall not apply to any healing arts board as specified in Section 701.

(History: Added by Stats. 1994, Ch. 26, Sec. 14.   Effective March 30, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------

464.

(a) Any of the boards within the department may establish, by regulation, a system for a retired category of licensure for persons who are not actively engaged in the practice of their profession or vocation.

(b) The regulation shall contain the following:

(1) A retired license shall be issued to a person with either an active license or an inactive license that was not placed on inactive status for disciplinary reasons. 

(2) The holder of a retired license issued pursuant to this section shall not engage in any activity
 for which a license is required, unless the board, by regulation, specifies the criteria for a retired licensee to practice his or her profession or vocation.

(3) The holder of a retired license shall not be required to renew that license.

(4) The board shall establish an appropriate application fee for a retired license to cover the reasonable regulatory cost of issuing a retired license.

(5) In order for the holder of a retired license issued pursuant to this section to restore his or her license to an active status, the holder of that license shall meet all the following:

(A) Pay a fee established by statute or regulation.

(B) Certify, in a manner satisfactory to the board, that he or she has not committed an act or crime constituting grounds for denial of licensure.

(C) Comply with the fingerprint submission requirements established by regulation.

(D) If the board requires completion of continuing education for renewal of an active license, complete continuing education equivalent to that required for renewal of an active license, unless a different requirement is specified by the board.

(E) Complete any other requirements as specified by the board by regulation.

(c) A board may upon its own
 determination, and shall upon receipt of a complaint from any person, investigate the actions of any licensee, including a person with a license that either restricts or prohibits the practice of that person in his or her profession or vocation, including, but not limited to, a license that is retired, inactive, canceled, revoked, or suspended. 

(d) Subdivisions (a) and (b) shall not apply to a board that has other statutory authority to establish a retired license.

(History: Added by Stats. 2016, Ch. 473, Sec. 1.   (AB 2859)   Effective January 1, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 8. Dispute Resolution Programs [465. - 471.5.]



  ARTICLE 1. Legislative Purpose [465. - 465.5.]

465.

The Legislature hereby finds and declares all of the following:

(a) The resolution of many disputes can be unnecessarily costly, time-consuming, and complex when achieved through formal court proceedings where the parties are adversaries and are subjected to formalized procedures.

(b) To achieve more effective and efficient dispute resolution in a complex society, greater use of alternatives to the courts, such as mediation, conciliation, and arbitration should be encouraged. Community dispute resolution programs and increased use of other alternatives to the formal judicial system may offer less threatening and more flexible forums for persons of all ethnic, racial, and socioeconomic backgrounds. These alternatives, among other things, can assist in the resolution of disputes between neighbors, some domestic disputes, consumer-merchant disputes, and other kinds of disputes in which the parties have continuing relationships. A noncoercive dispute resolution forum in the community may also provide a valuable prevention and early intervention problem-solving resource to the community.

(c) Local resources, including volunteers reflective of the diversity of the community and available public buildings should be utilized to achieve more accessible, cost-effective resolutions of disputes. Additional financial resources are needed to expand, stabilize, and improve existing programs and entities which sponsor alternative dispute resolution.

(d) Courts, prosecuting authorities, law enforcement agencies, and administrative agencies should encourage greater use of alternative dispute resolution techniques whenever the administration of justice will be improved.

(e) Counties should consider increasing the use of alternative dispute resolution in their operations as plans for court reform are developed and implemented. 

(f) The Judicial Council should consider, in redrafting or updating any of the official pleading forms used in the trial courts of this state, the inclusion of information on options for alternative dispute resolution.

(History: Added by Stats. 1986, Ch. 1313, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

465.5.

It is the intent of the Legislature to permit counties to accomplish all of the following:

(a) Encouragement and support of the development and use of alternative dispute resolution techniques.

(b) Encouragement and support of community participation in the development, administration, and oversight of local programs designed to facilitate the informal resolution of disputes among members of the community.

(c) Development of structures for dispute resolution that may serve as models for resolution programs in other communities.

(d) Education of communities with regard to the availability and benefits of alternative dispute resolution techniques.

(e) Encouragement of courts, prosecuting authorities, public defenders, law enforcement agencies, and administrative agencies to work in cooperation with, and to make referrals to, dispute resolution programs.

At the time that the state assumes the responsibility for the funding of California trial courts, consideration shall be given to the Dispute Resolution Advisory Council’s evaluation of the effectiveness of alternative dispute resolution programs and the feasibility of the operation of a statewide program of grants, with the intention of funding alternative dispute resolution programs on a statewide basis.

(History: Added by Stats. 1986, Ch. 1313, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Definitions [466. - 466.]

466.

As used in this chapter:

(a) “Dispute resolution” includes, but is not limited to, mediation, conciliation, and arbitration.

(b) “Program” means an entity that provides dispute resolution.

(c) “Advisory Council” means the Dispute Resolution Advisory Council.

(History: Added by Stats. 1986, Ch. 1313, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3. Establishment and Administration of Programs [467. - 467.7.]

467.

(a) There is in the Division of Consumer Services of the Department of Consumer Affairs a Dispute Resolution Advisory Council. The advisory council shall complete the duties required by this chapter no later than January 1, 1989. 

(b) The advisory council shall consist of seven persons, five of whom shall be appointed by the Governor. One member shall be appointed by the Senate Rules Committee, and one member shall be appointed by the Speaker of the Assembly. At least four of the persons appointed to the advisory council shall be active members of the State Bar of California, and at least four persons appointed to the advisory council shall have a minimum of two years of direct experience in utilizing dispute resolution techniques. The members of the advisory council shall reflect the racial, ethnic, sexual, and geographic diversity of the State of California.

(c) The members of the advisory council shall not receive a salary for their services but shall be reimbursed for their actual and necessary travel and other expenses incurred in the performance of their duties.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1987, Ch. 28, Sec. 1.   Effective May 28, 1987.)
-------------------------------------------

467.1.

(a) A program funded pursuant to this chapter shall be operated pursuant to contract with the county and shall comply with all of the requirements of this chapter and the rules and regulations of the advisory council.

(b) Counties may establish a program of grants to public entities and nonpartisan nonprofit corporations for the establishment and continuance of programs to be operated under the requirements of this chapter and the standards developed by the advisory council. The board of supervisors of a county in which, because of the county’s size, the distribution authorized by Section 470.5 is insufficient to establish a county program may enter into an agreement with the board of supervisors of one or more other such counties to establish a program authorized by this chapter on a regional basis.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2005, Ch. 75, Sec. 2.   Effective July 19, 2005.   Operative January 1, 2006, by Sec. 156 of Ch. 75.)
-------------------------------------------

467.2.

A program shall not be eligible for funding under this chapter unless it meets all of the following requirements:

(a) Compliance with this chapter and the applicable rules and regulations of the advisory council.

(b) Provision of neutral persons adequately trained in conflict resolution techniques as required by the rules and regulations promulgated by the advisory council pursuant to Section 471.

(c) Provision of dispute resolution, on a sliding scale basis, and without cost to indigents.

(d) Provision that, upon consent of the parties, a written agreement or an award resolving a dispute will be issued setting out a settlement of the issues involved in the dispute and the future responsibilities of each party.

(e) Provision of neutral procedures applicable equally to all participants without any special benefit or consideration given to persons or entities providing funding for the programs.

(f) Provision that participation in the program is voluntary and that the parties are not coerced to enter dispute resolution.

(g) Provision of alternative dispute resolution is the primary purpose of the program.

(h) Programs operated by counties that receive funding under this chapter shall be operated primarily for the purposes of dispute resolution, consistent with the purposes of this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 1986, Ch. 1313, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

467.3.

Programs funded pursuant to this chapter shall provide persons indicating an intention to utilize the dispute resolution process with a written statement prior to the dispute resolution proceeding, in language easy to read and understand, stating all of the following:

(a) The nature of the dispute.

(b) The nature of the dispute resolution process.

(c) The rights and obligations of the parties, including, but not limited to, all of the following:

(1) The right to call and examine witnesses.

(2) The right of the parties to be accompanied by counsel, who may participate as permitted under the rules and procedures of the program.

(d) The procedures under which the dispute resolution will be conducted.

(e) If the parties enter into arbitration, whether the dispute resolution process will be binding.

(History: Added by Stats. 1986, Ch. 1313, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

467.4.

(a) An agreement resolving a dispute entered into with the assistance of a program shall not be enforceable in a court nor shall it be admissible as evidence in any judicial or administrative proceeding, unless the consent of the parties or the agreement includes a provision that clearly states the intention of the parties that the agreement or any resulting award shall be so enforceable or admissible as evidence.

(b) The parties may agree in writing to toll the applicable statute of limitations during the pendency of the dispute resolution process.

(History: Added by Stats. 1986, Ch. 1313, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

467.5.

Notwithstanding the express application of Chapter 2 (commencing with Section 1115) of Division 9 of the Evidence Code to mediations, all proceedings conducted by a program funded pursuant to this chapter, including, but not limited to, arbitrations and conciliations, are subject to Chapter 2 (commencing with Section 1115) of Division 9 of the Evidence Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1997, Ch. 772, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

467.6.

Each program shall maintain those statistical records required by Section 471.5, and as may be required by the county. The records shall maintain the confidentiality and anonymity of the parties.

(History: Added by Stats. 1986, Ch. 1313, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

467.7.

(a) Unless the parties have agreed to a binding award, nothing in this chapter shall be construed to prohibit any person who voluntarily enters the dispute resolution process from revoking his or her consent, withdrawing from dispute resolution, and seeking judicial or administrative redress.

(b) In cases in which a criminal complaint has been filed by a prosecutor, other than for an infraction, the advice of counsel shall be obtained before any dispute resolution process is initiated. Nothing in this subdivision shall be construed to preclude a defendant from knowingly and voluntarily waiving the right to counsel. A defendant who indicates a desire to waive the right to counsel shall be encouraged to consult with the public defender or private counsel before waiving that right.

(History: Added by Stats. 1986, Ch. 1313, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 4. Application Procedures [468. - 468.3.]

468.

All funds available to a county for the purposes of this chapter shall be utilized for projects proposed by eligible programs.

(History: Added by Stats. 1986, Ch. 1313, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

468.1.

Programs shall be selected for funding by a county from the applications submitted therefor.

(History: Added by Stats. 1986, Ch. 1313, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

468.2.

Applications submitted for funding shall include, but need not be limited to, all of the following information:

(a) Evidence of compliance with Sections 467.2, 467.3, and 467.4.

(b) A description of the proposed community area of service, cost of the principal components of operation, and any other characteristics, as determined by rules of the advisory council.

(c) A description of available dispute resolution services and facilities within the defined geographical area.

(d) A description of the applicant’s proposed program, by type and purpose, including evidence of community support, the present availability of resources, and the applicant’s administrative capability.

(e) A description of existing or planned cooperation between the applicant and local human service and justice system agencies.

(f) A demonstrated effort on the part of the applicant to show the manner in which funds that may be awarded under this program may be coordinated or consolidated with other local, state, or federal funds available for the activities described in Sections 467.2, 467.3, and 467.4.

(g) An explanation of the methods to be used for selecting and training mediators and other facilitators used in the dispute resolution process.

(h) Such additional information as may be required by the county.

(History: Added by Stats. 1986, Ch. 1313, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

468.3.

Data supplied by each applicant shall be used to assign relative funding priority on the basis of criteria developed by the advisory council. The criteria may include, but shall not be limited to, all of the following, in addition to the criteria set forth in Section 468.2:

(a) Unit cost, according to the type and scope of the proposed program.

(b) Quality and validity of the program.

(c) Number of participants who may be served.

(d) Administrative capability.

(e) Community support factors.

(History: Added by Stats. 1986, Ch. 1313, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 5. Payment Procedures [469. - 469.]

469.

Upon the approval of the county, funds available for the purposes of this chapter shall be used for the costs of operation of approved programs. Not more than 10 percent of funds available for the purposes of this chapter shall be used to finance the administration of the program by a county with a population of 500,000 or more persons, and no more than 20 percent may be so used if its population is less than that amount. All moneys allocated for the purposes of this chapter shall be apportioned and distributed to programs in the county, taking into account the relative population and needs of a community as well as the availability of existing dispute resolution facilities offering alternatives to the formal judicial system. If any program receives funding from any other county fee enhancements collected for the purpose of funding alternative dispute resolution services, the county shall consider that fact in determining the appropriate level of funding for a particular program. The methods of payment or reimbursement for dispute resolution costs shall be specified by the county and may vary among programs. All such arrangements shall conform to the regulations of the advisory council.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1992, Ch. 685, Sec. 1.   Effective September 14, 1992.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 6. Funding [470. - 470.6.]

470.

A county may accept and disburse funds from any public or private source for the purposes of this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 1986, Ch. 1313, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

470.1.

(a) A grant recipient may accept funds from any public or private source for the purposes of this chapter.

(b) A county and its representatives may inspect, examine, and audit the fiscal affairs of the programs and the projects funded under this chapter.

(c) Programs shall, whenever reasonably possible, make use of public facilities at free or nominal costs.

(History: Added by Stats. 1986, Ch. 1313, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

470.2.

A county’s share of the funding pursuant to this chapter shall not exceed 50 percent of the approved estimated cost of the program.

(History: Added by Stats. 1986, Ch. 1313, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

470.5.

(a) On and after January 1, 2006, as described in Section 68085.1 of the Government Code, the Administrative Office of the Courts shall make monthly distributions from superior court filing fees for the support of dispute resolution programs under this chapter in each county that has acted to establish a program. The amount distributed in each county shall be equal to the following:

(1) From each first paper filing fee collected by the court as provided under Section 70611 or 70612, subdivision (a) of Section 70613, subdivision (a) of Section 70614, or Section 70670 of the Government Code, and each first paper or petition filing fee collected by the court in a probate matter as provided under Section 70650, 70651, 70652, 70653, or 70655 of the Government Code, the same amount as was required to be collected for the support of dispute resolution programs in that county as of December 31, 2005, when a fee was collected for the filing of a first paper in a civil action under Section 26820.4 of the Government Code.

(2) From each first paper filing fee in a limited civil case collected by the court as provided under subdivision (b) of Section 70613 or subdivision (b) of Section 70614 of the Government Code, and each first paper or petition filing fee collected by the court in a probate matter as provided under Section 70654, 70656, or 70658 of the Government Code, the same amount as was required to be collected for the support of dispute resolution programs in that county as of December 31, 2005, when a fee was collected for the filing of a first paper in a civil action under Section 72055 of the Government Code where the amount demanded, excluding attorney’s fees and costs, was ten thousand dollars ($10,000) or less.

(b) Distributions under this section shall be used only for the support of dispute resolution programs authorized by this chapter. The county shall deposit the amounts distributed under this section in an account created and maintained for this purpose by the county. Records of these distributions shall be available for inspection by the public upon request.

(c) After January 1, 2006, a county that does not already have a distribution from superior court filing fees under this section and that establishes a dispute resolution program authorized by this chapter may approve a distribution under this section. A county that already has a distribution under this section may change the amount of the distribution. The total amount to be distributed for the support of dispute resolution programs under this section may not exceed eight dollars ($8) per filing fee.

(d) The county may make changes under subdivision (c) to be effective January 1 or July 1 of any year, on and after January 1, 2006. The county shall provide the Administrative Office of the Courts with a copy of the action of the board of supervisors that establishes the change at least 15 days before the date that the change goes into effect.

(History: Added by Stats. 2005, Ch. 75, Sec. 4.   Effective July 19, 2005.   Operative January 1, 2006, by Sec. 156 of Ch. 75.)
-------------------------------------------

470.6.

A county may carry over moneys received from distributions under Section 470.5 and from the fees for the support of dispute resolution programs authorized by this chapter that were added to fees for filing a first paper in a civil action in superior court under the laws in effect before January 1, 2006.

(History: Added by Stats. 2005, Ch. 75, Sec. 5.   Effective July 19, 2005.   Operative January 1, 2006, by Sec. 156 of Ch. 75.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 7. Rules and Regulations [471. - 471.5.]

471.

(a) The advisory council shall adopt rules and regulations to effectuate the purposes of this chapter, including, but not limited to, guidelines to be used by the programs for the recruitment and training of persons conducting dispute resolution, and provisions for periodic monitoring and evaluation of the programs funded pursuant to this chapter. The advisory council shall establish guidelines to evaluate the performance of participating programs, which shall include analysis of court caseload reduction, cost savings to the state, the efficacy of the programs, and the feasibility of operation of a statewide program of grants at the time the state assumes the responsibility for the funding of trial courts.

(b) The advisory council shall adopt temporary guidelines within six months of its initial meeting. The adoption of these temporary guidelines shall not be subject to the procedures specified in Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code.

Upon the adoption of the temporary guidelines, counties may award grants pursuant to this chapter. Programs funded pursuant to this chapter shall comply with the temporary guidelines, the requirements of this chapter and, when adopted, the formal rules and regulations.

(c) Formal rules and regulations implementing this chapter shall be adopted pursuant to Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code and, upon adoption, shall supersede the temporary guidelines adopted pursuant to subdivision (b).

(d) On and after January 1, 1989, or such earlier date as the advisory council completes its duties pursuant to this chapter, the Division of Consumer Services of the Department of Consumer Affairs shall periodically review the effectiveness of the rules and regulations adopted pursuant to this chapter and adopt changes thereto as necessary. It also shall monitor and evaluate the programs funded pursuant to this chapter as to their compliance with those rules and regulations.

(e) The Director of Consumer Affairs shall administer and enforce this chapter and the rules and regulations adopted pursuant to this chapter, and in so doing may exercise any power conferred under Chapter 4 (commencing with Section 300).

(History: Amended by Stats. 1990, Ch. 1272, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

471.3.

The rules and regulations adopted by the advisory council pursuant to Section 471 shall be formulated to promote statewide uniformity with the guidelines contained in those rules and regulations.

(History: Added by Stats. 1987, Ch. 28, Sec. 6.   Effective May 28, 1987.)
-------------------------------------------

471.5.

Each program funded pursuant to this chapter shall annually provide the county with statistical data regarding its operating budget; the number of referrals, categories, or types of cases referred to the program; the number of persons served by the program; the number of disputes resolved; the nature of the disputes resolved; rates of compliance; the number of persons utilizing the process more than once; the duration of and the estimated costs of the hearings conducted by the programs; and any other information that the county may require. The data shall maintain the confidentiality and anonymity of the persons employing the dispute resolution process.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1987, Ch. 56, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 9. Certification of Third-Party Dispute Resolution Processes for New Motor Vehicles [472. - 472.5.]

472.

Unless the context requires otherwise, the following definitions govern the construction of this chapter:

(a) “New motor vehicle” means a new motor vehicle as defined in paragraph (2) of subdivision (e) of Section 1793.22 of the Civil Code.

(b) “Manufacturer” means a new motor vehicle manufacturer, manufacturer branch, distributor, or distributor branch required to be licensed pursuant to Article 1 (commencing with Section 11700) of Chapter 4 of Division 5 of the Vehicle Code.

(c) “Qualified third party dispute resolution process” means a third party dispute resolution process which operates in compliance with subdivision (d) of Section 1793.22 of the Civil Code and this chapter and which has been certified by the department pursuant to this chapter.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1992, Ch. 1232, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------

472.1.

The department shall establish a program for certifying each third-party dispute resolution process used for the arbitration of disputes pursuant to subdivision (c) of Section 1793.22 of the Civil Code. In establishing the program, the department shall do all of the following:

(a) Prescribe and provide forms to be used to apply for certification under this chapter.

(b) Establish a set of minimum standards which shall be used to determine whether a third-party dispute resolution process is in substantial compliance with subdivision (d) of Section 1793.22 of the Civil Code and this chapter.

(c) Prescribe the information which each manufacturer, or other entity, that operates a third-party dispute resolution process shall provide the department in the application for certification. In prescribing the information to accompany the application for certification, the department shall require the manufacturer, or other entity, to provide only that information which the department finds is reasonably necessary to enable the department to determine whether the third-party dispute resolution process is in substantial compliance with subdivision (d) of Section 1793.22 of the Civil Code and this chapter.

(d) Prescribe the information that each qualified third-party dispute resolution process shall provide the department, and the time intervals at which the information shall be required, to enable the department to determine whether the qualified third-party dispute resolution process continues to operate in substantial compliance with subdivision (d) of Section 1793.22 of the Civil Code and this chapter.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1992, Ch. 1232, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------

472.2.

(a) Each manufacturer may establish, or otherwise make available to buyers or lessees of new motor vehicles, a qualified third-party dispute resolution process for the resolution of disputes pursuant to subdivision (c) of Section 1793.22 of the Civil Code. A manufacturer that itself operates the third-party dispute resolution process shall apply to the department for certification of that process. If the manufacturer makes the third-party dispute resolution process available to buyers or lessees of new motor vehicles through contract or other arrangement with another entity, that entity shall apply to the department for certification. An entity that operates a third-party dispute resolution process for more than one manufacturer shall make a separate application for certification for each manufacturer that uses that entity’s third-party dispute resolution process. The application for certification shall be accompanied by the information prescribed by the department.

(b) The department shall review the application and accompanying information and, after conducting an onsite inspection, shall determine whether the third-party dispute resolution process is in substantial compliance with subdivision (d) of Section 1793.22 of the Civil Code and this chapter. If the department determines that the process is in substantial compliance, the department shall certify the process. If the department determines that the process is not in substantial compliance, the department shall deny certification and shall state, in writing, the reasons for denial and the modifications in the operation of the process that are required in order for the process to be certified.

(c) The department shall make a final determination whether to certify a third-party dispute resolution process or to deny certification not later than 90 calendar days following the date the department accepts the application for certification as complete.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1992, Ch. 1232, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------

472.3.

(a) The department, in accordance with the time intervals prescribed pursuant to subdivision (d) of Section 472.1, but at least once annually, shall review the operation and performance of each qualified third-party dispute resolution process and determine, using the information provided the department as prescribed pursuant to subdivision (d) of Section 472.1 and the monitoring and inspection information described in subdivision (c) of Section 472.4, whether the process is operating in substantial compliance with subdivision (d) of Section 1793.22 of the Civil Code and this chapter. If the department determines that the process is in substantial compliance, the certification shall remain in effect.

(b) If the department determines that the process is not in substantial compliance with subdivision (d) of Section 1793.22 of the Civil Code or this chapter, the department shall issue a notice of decertification to the entity which operates the process and shall send a copy of that notice to any manufacturer affected by the decertification. The notice of decertification shall state the reasons for the issuance of the notice and prescribe the modifications in the operation of the process that are required in order for the process to retain its certification.

(c) A notice of decertification shall take effect 180 calendar days following the date the notice is served on the manufacturer, or other entity, which uses the process that the department has determined is not in substantial compliance with subdivision (d) of Section 1793.22 of the Civil Code or this chapter. The department shall withdraw the notice of decertification prior to its effective date if the department determines, after a public hearing, that the manufacturer, or other entity, which uses the process has made the modifications in the operation of the process required in the notice of decertification and is in substantial compliance with subdivision (d) of Section 1793.22 of the Civil Code and this chapter.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1992, Ch. 1232, Sec. 4.   Effective January 1, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------

472.4.

In addition to any other requirements of this chapter, the department shall do all of the following:

(a) Establish procedures to assist owners or lessees of new motor vehicles who have complaints regarding the operation of a qualified third-party dispute resolution process.

(b) Establish methods for measuring customer satisfaction and to identify violations of this chapter, which shall include an annual random postcard or telephone survey by the department of the customers of each qualified third-party dispute resolution process.

(c) Monitor and inspect, on a regular basis, qualified third-party dispute resolution
 processes to determine whether they continue to meet the standards for certification. Monitoring and inspection shall include, but not be limited to, all of the following:

(1) Virtual or onsite inspections of each qualified third-party dispute resolution process not less frequently than twice annually.

(2) Investigation of complaints from consumers regarding the operation of qualified third-party dispute resolution processes and analyses of representative samples of complaints against each process.

(3) Analyses of the annual surveys required by subdivision (b).

(d) Notify the Department of Motor Vehicles of the failure of a manufacturer to honor a decision of a qualified third-party dispute resolution process to enable the Department of Motor Vehicles
 to take appropriate enforcement action against the manufacturer pursuant to Section 11705.4 of the Vehicle Code.

(e) Submit a biennial report to the Legislature evaluating the effectiveness of this chapter, make available to the public summaries of the statistics and other information supplied by each qualified third-party dispute resolution process, and publish educational materials regarding the purposes of this chapter.

(f) Adopt regulations as necessary and appropriate to implement this chapter and subdivision (d) of Section 1793.22 of the Civil Code.

(g) Protection of the public shall be the highest priority for the department in exercising its certification, regulatory, and disciplinary functions. Whenever the protection of the public is inconsistent with other interests sought to be promoted, the protection of
 the public shall be paramount.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 510, Sec. 2.   (SB 887)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

472.5.

The New Motor Vehicle Board in the Department of Motor Vehicles shall, in accordance with the procedures prescribed in this section, administer the collection of fees for the purposes of fully funding the administration of this chapter.

(a) Fees collected pursuant to this section shall be deposited in the Certification Account in the Consumer Affairs Fund and shall be available, upon appropriation by the Legislature, exclusively to pay the expenses incurred by the department in administering this chapter and to pay the New Motor Vehicle Board as provided in Section 3016 of the Vehicle Code. If, at the conclusion of any fiscal year, the amount of fees collected exceeds the amount of expenditures for that purpose during that fiscal year, the surplus in the Certification Account shall be carried over into the succeeding fiscal year.

(b) Beginning July 1, 1988, and on or before May 1 of each calendar year thereafter, every manufacturer shall file with the New Motor Vehicle Board a statement of the number of motor vehicles sold, leased, or otherwise distributed by or for the manufacturer in this state during the preceding calendar year, and shall, upon written notice delivered to the manufacturer by certified mail, return receipt requested, pay to the New Motor Vehicle Board a fee, not to exceed one dollar ($1) for each motor vehicle sold, leased, or distributed by or for the manufacturer in this state during the preceding calendar year. The total fee paid by each manufacturer shall be rounded to the nearest dollar in the manner described in Section 9559 of the Vehicle Code. Not more than one dollar ($1) shall be charged, collected, or received from any one or more manufacturers pursuant to this subdivision with respect to the same motor vehicle.

(c) (1) The fee required by subdivision (b) is due and payable not later than 30 days after the manufacturer has received notice of the amount due and is delinquent after that time. A penalty of 10 percent of the amount delinquent shall be added to that amount, if the delinquency continues for more than 30 days.

(2) If a manufacturer fails to file the statement required by subdivision (b) by the date specified, the New Motor Vehicle Board shall assess the amount due from the manufacturer by using as the number of motor vehicles sold, leased, or otherwise distributed by or for the manufacturer in this state during the preceding calendar year the total number of new registrations of all motor vehicles sold, leased, or otherwise distributed by or for the manufacturer during the preceding calendar year.

(d) On or before February 1 of each year, the department shall notify the New Motor Vehicle Board of the dollar amount necessary to fully fund the program established by this chapter during the following fiscal year. The New Motor Vehicle Board shall use this information in calculating the amounts of the fees to be collected from manufacturers pursuant to this section.

(e) For purposes of this section, “motor vehicle” means a new passenger or commercial motor vehicle of a kind that is required to be registered under the Vehicle Code, but the term does not include a motorcycle, a motor home, or any vehicle whose gross weight exceeds 10,000 pounds.

(f) The New Motor Vehicle Board may adopt regulations to implement this section. The regulations shall include, at a minimum, a formula for calculating the fee, established pursuant to subdivision (b), for each motor vehicle and the total amount of fees to be collected from each manufacturer.
